Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 3. LEGISLATIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE Z. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 391. RESOLUTIONS FOR STATE SYMBOLS, PLACE DESIGNATIONS, AND RECOGNITION DAYS, WEEKS, AND MONTHS

Sec. 391.001. EFFECT OF CHAPTER. (a) This chapter governs the designation of state symbols, place designations, and days, weeks, and months for recognition made by the legislature by resolution approved by each house of the legislature.

(b) This chapter does not affect the designation of:

(1) a state symbol or a place designation made by:

(A) resolution before September 1, 2001; or

(B) statute; or

(2) a day, week, or month for recognition made by:

(A) resolution before September 1, 2009; or

(B) statute.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 395, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1081 (H.B. 4767), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 391.002. STATE SYMBOLS. (a) The legislature must specify an item's historical or cultural significance to the state before designating the item as a state symbol.

(b) The legislature may not designate any of the following as a state symbol:

(1) a commercial product or an item that promotes or advocates the use of a commercial product;

(2) an individual;

(3) an event; or

(4) a place.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1081, Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 2009.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 395, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1081 (H.B. 4767), Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 391.003. PLACE DESIGNATIONS. (a) In this section, "place designation" means a special observance by the legislature that recognizes and honors an event or location in this state, including a municipality or county.

(b) The legislature may not assign the same place designation to more than one event or location.

(c) The legislature may not assign more than one place designation to any municipality, county, or other location. This subsection does not prohibit the legislature from assigning more than one place designation within a county.

(d) Before the legislature may assign a place designation to a municipality, county, or other location, the legislature must be presented by persons supporting the designation with:

(1) information related to the historical or cultural significance of the event or location to be designated; and

(2) documentation that a local chamber of commerce or a locally elected governmental body representing the municipality, county, or other location to be designated supports the designation.

(e) A place designation expires on the 10th anniversary of its designation. This subsection does not prevent the legislature from redesignating a place designation during or after the 10-year period.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1081, Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 2009.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 395, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1081 (H.B. 4767), Sec. 4, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 391.004. DESIGNATING DAYS, WEEKS, OR MONTHS FOR RECOGNITION. (a) In this section, "date designation" means the special observance authorized by the legislature that annually recognizes and honors a culturally or historically significant day, week, or month in the state.

(b) The legislature may assign more than one designation to a day, week, or month.

(c) Before the legislature may designate a day, week, or month for recognition, the legislature must be presented with information related to the historical or cultural significance of the day, week, or month to be recognized by persons supporting the designation.

(d) A designation of a day, week, or month for recognition expires on the 10th anniversary of the date the legislature finally passes the resolution making the designation. This subsection does not prevent the legislature from redesignating a day, week, or month for recognition during or after the 10-year period.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1081 (H.B. 4767), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.